Texas statutes.
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CODE

TITLE 3. LICENSES AND PERMITS

SUBTITLE A. PERMITS

CHAPTER 46. BONDED WAREHOUSE PERMIT

Sec. 46.01. AUTHORIZED ACTIVITIES. The holder of a bonded warehouse permit may store liquor for any permittee who holds a permit authorizing its storage in a public bonded warehouse.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 459, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 46.03. QUALIFICATIONS FOR PERMIT. (a) A bonded warehouse permit may be issued to any public bonded warehouse that:

(1) derives at least 50 percent of its gross revenue in a bona fide manner during each three-month period from the storage of goods or merchandise other than liquor; and

(2) is not located in a dry area.

(b) A bonded warehouse permit may be issued to a public bonded warehouse described by Subsection (a)(1) of this section that is located in a dry area only for the storage of the wine of the holder of a winery permit who holds a permit authorizing its storage in a public bonded warehouse.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 459, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 934, Sec. 46, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 46.04. STORAGE INFORMATION. The holder of a bonded warehouse permit shall furnish such information concerning the liquor stored and withdrawn as may be required by the commission.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 459, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.